Maryland, session 2025, SB1004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
9–102.
(A) [An] IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION, AN
equity court may[:
(1)] consider a petition for reasonable visitation of a grandchild by a
grandparent[; and
(2) if the court finds it to be in the best interests of the child, grant
visitation rights to the grandparent].
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1004*

SENATE BILL 1004
SUBSECTION AND SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN EQUITY COURT MAY GRANT
VISITATION RIGHTS TO A GRANDPARENT IF:
(I) THE PETITION FOR VISITATION RIGHTS WAS FILED AFTER
AN ACTION FOR DIVORCE, ANNULMENT, CUSTODY, OR PATERNITY WAS FILED BY A
PARENT OF THE CHILD; AND
(II) THE COURT FINDS THAT GRANTING VISITATION RIGHTS TO
THE GRANDPARENT:
1. IS IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD; AND
2. WOULD NOT INTERFERE WITH THE PARENT–CHILD
RELATIONSHIP.
(2) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II)1 OF
THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT SHALL CONSIDER THE AMOUNT OF PERSONAL
CONTACT THAT OCCURRED BETWEEN THE GRANDPARENT AND THE CHILD BEFORE
THE FILING OF THE PETITION.
(C) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, AN
EQUITY COURT SHALL GRANT VISITATION RIGHTS TO A GRANDPARENT UNDER THIS
SECTION IF:
(1) (I) THE CHILD RESIDED WITH THE GRANDPARENT FOR A
PERIOD OF AT LEAST 12 MONTHS; OR
(II) THE CHILD’S PARENT WHO IS THE CHILD OF THE
GRANDPARENT IS DECEASED; AND
(2) THE COURT FINDS THAT GRANTING VISITATION RIGHTS TO THE
GRANDPARENT:
(I) IS IN THE BEST INTERESTS OF THE CHILD; AND
(II) WOULD NOT INTERFERE WITH THE PARENT–CHILD
RELATIONSHIP.
(D) IN MAKING A DETERMINATION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT MAY
NOT DENY VISITATION RIGHTS BASED ON ALLEGATIONS THAT GRANTING
VISITATION RIGHTS TO THE GRANDPARENT WOULD INTERFERE WITH THE
PARENT–CHILD RELATIONSHIP UNLESS, AFTER A HEARING, THE COURT
DETERMINES BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT INTERFERENCE

SENATE BILL 1004 3
WOULD OCCUR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.